Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1116
Jurisdiction of county board.

During the period any area is designated as an industrial area as provided by sections 13-1111 to 13-1120, the county board in which the greater area of real estate is located shall have exclusive jurisdiction for zoning and otherwise regulating the use of the industrial area in such a way as to confer upon the owners and users thereof the benefits of a designated tract to be held and reserved for industrial purposes only; Provided, such authority shall not be granted to the county board if the zoning of such designated area is within the jurisdiction of any city or village.

Laws 1957, c. 51, § 5, p. 241;

Laws 1965, c. 84, § 5, p. 325;

Laws 1979, LB 217, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 19-2505.

County board has authority to designate industrial areas for zoning. City of Grand Island v. Ehlers, 180 Neb. 331, 142 N.W.2d 770 (1966).